Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1028.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1624XC (3) 91 jda/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256.11, subsections 3 and 4, Code 2025, 1 are amended to read as follows: 2 3. The following areas shall be taught in grades one through 3 six: English-language arts, social studies, mathematics, 4 science, health, physical education, traffic safety, music, 5 visual art, and, subject to section 279.80 , age-appropriate and 6 research-based human growth and development that incorporates 7 the standards established under section 279.50, subsection 2, 8 paragraph âbâ . Computer science instruction incorporating 9 the standards established under section 256.7, subsection 10 26 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (4), shall be offered in 11 at least one grade level commencing with the school year 12 beginning July 1, 2023. The health curriculum shall include 13 the characteristics of communicable diseases. The state board 14 as part of accreditation standards shall adopt curriculum 15 definitions for implementing the elementary program. 16 4. The following shall be taught in grades seven and 17 eight: English-language arts; social studies, including 18 instruction related to civics; mathematics; science; health; 19 age-appropriate and research-based human growth and development 20 that incorporates the standards established under section 21 279.50, subsection 3, paragraph âbâ ; career exploration 22 and development; physical education; music; and visual art. 23 Computer science instruction incorporating the standards 24 established under section 256.7, subsection 26 , paragraph âaâ , 25 subparagraph (4), shall be offered in at least one grade level 26 commencing with the school year beginning July 1, 2023. Career 27 exploration and development shall be designed so that students 28 are appropriately prepared to create an individual career 29 and academic plan pursuant to section 279.61 , incorporate 30 foundational career and technical education concepts aligned 31 with the six career and technical education service areas as 32 defined in subsection 5 , paragraph âhâ , incorporate relevant 33 twenty-first century skills to facilitate career readiness, 34 and introduce students to career opportunities within the 35 -1- LSB 1624XC (3) 91 jda/jh 1/ 5 S.F. _____ local community and across this state. The health curriculum 1 shall include age-appropriate and research-based information 2 regarding the characteristics of sexually transmitted diseases. 3 The state board as part of accreditation standards shall adopt 4 curriculum definitions for implementing the program in grades 5 seven and eight. However, this subsection shall not apply to 6 the teaching of career exploration and development in nonpublic 7 schools. 8 Sec. 2. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph j, 9 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 10 (1) One unit of health education which may include personal 11 health; food and nutrition; environmental health; safety and 12 survival skills; consumer health; family life; age-appropriate 13 and research-based human growth and development that 14 incorporates the standards established under section 279.50, 15 subsection 3, paragraph âbâ ; substance use disorder and nonuse; 16 emotional and social health; health resources; cardiopulmonary 17 resuscitation; and prevention and control of disease, including 18 age-appropriate and research-based information regarding 19 sexually transmitted diseases. 20 Sec. 3. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph g, Code 21 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 22 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (01) The educational standards of 23 section 256.11 relating to the human growth and development 24 curriculum for grades one through eight or the health 25 curriculum for grades nine through twelve. 26 Sec. 4. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 27 by adding the following new paragraph: 28 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Be subject to and comply with the 29 requirements of section 256.11 relating to the human growth and 30 development curriculum for grades one through eight and the 31 health curriculum for grades nine through twelve. 32 Sec. 5. Section 279.50, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2025, are 33 amended to read as follows: 34 2. a. Subject to section 279.80 , each school board shall 35 -2- LSB 1624XC (3) 91 jda/jh 2/ 5 S.F. _____ provide age-appropriate and research-based instruction in 1 human growth and development including instruction regarding 2 self-esteem, stress management, interpersonal relationships, 3 and domestic abuse in grades one through six. 4 b. The age-appropriate and research-based instruction in 5 human growth and development described in paragraph âaâ shall 6 include all of the following: 7 (1) Instruction related to human development inside the 8 womb. 9 (2) A high-definition ultrasound video showing the presence 10 of the brain, heart, and other vital organs in early fetal 11 development. 12 (3) A high-quality, computer-generated rendering or 13 animation that depicts the humanity of the unborn child by 14 showing prenatal human development, starting at fertilization, 15 noting significant markers in cell growth and organ development 16 throughout every stage of pregnancy. 17 c. The state board of education shall adopt rules pursuant 18 to chapter 17A to administer and interpret this subsection. 19 3. a. Each school board shall provide age-appropriate and 20 research-based instruction in human growth and development 21 including instruction regarding human sexuality, self-esteem, 22 stress management, interpersonal relationships, domestic abuse, 23 and the prevention and control of disease, including sexually 24 transmitted diseases as required in section 256.11 , in grades 25 seven through twelve. 26 b. The age-appropriate and research-based instruction in 27 human growth and development described in paragraph âaâ shall 28 include all of the following: 29 (1) Instruction related to human development inside the 30 womb. 31 (2) A high-definition ultrasound video showing the presence 32 of the brain, heart, and other vital organs in early fetal 33 development. 34 (3) A high-quality, computer-generated rendering or 35 -3- LSB 1624XC (3) 91 jda/jh 3/ 5 S.F. _____ animation that depicts the humanity of the unborn child by 1 showing prenatal human development, starting at fertilization, 2 noting significant markers in cell growth and organ development 3 throughout every stage of pregnancy. 4 c. The state board of education shall adopt rules pursuant 5 to chapter 17A to administer and interpret this subsection. 6 Sec. 6. Section 279.50, subsection 10, paragraph b, Code 7 2025, is amended to read as follows: 8 b. âResearch-basedâ means all of the following: 9 (1) Complete complete, unbiased information that is 10 verified or supported by the weight of research conducted 11 in compliance with accepted scientific methods ; , recognized 12 as medically accurate and objective by leading professional 13 organizations and agencies with relevant expertise in the 14 field, such as the American college of obstetricians and 15 gynecologists, the American public health association, the 16 American academy of pediatrics, and the national association of 17 school nurses; and published in peer-reviewed journals where 18 appropriate. 19 (2) Information that is free of racial, ethnic, sexual 20 orientation, and gender biases. 21